th: ประเภทการยึดใบมีด: แคลป; คลิปออน; ถอดเปลี่ยนได้; ติดตั้งตายตัว; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação da lâmina: Clap; De encaixe; Conversível; Fixo; Outro
cs: Typ uchycení čepele: Klapačky; Nacvakávací; Vyměnitelné; Pevné; Jiné
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης λεπίδας: Clap; Με κλιπ (Clip-on); Μετατρέψιμη; Σταθερή; Άλλο
fr: Type de fixation de la lame: Clap; À clipser; Convertible; Fixe; Autre
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia čepele: Clap (odklápacie); Násuvné; Konvertibilné; Pevné; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação da lâmina: Clap; De encaixe; Convertível; Fixo; Outros
es: Tipo de sujeción de la hoja: Clap; Enganchable; Convertible; Fijo; Otro
pl: Typ mocowania ostrza: Zapadkowe (clap); Zatrzaskowe; Wymienne; Stałe; Inny
ko: 블레이드 부착 유형: 클랩; 클립온; 컨버터블; 고정형; 기타
sv: Typ av bladfäste: Klapp; Clip-on; Konverterbar; Fast; Övrigt
ja: ブレードアタッチメントタイプ: クラップ; クリップオン; コンバーチブル; 固定式; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta pričvršćivanja oštrice: Clap; Na kopčanje; Prilagodljiva; Fiksna; Ostalo
de: Kufenbefestigungstyp: Klapp; Clip-on; Umwandelbar; Starr; Sonstige
tr: Paten bıçağı bağlantı tipi: Clap; Klipsli; Dönüştürülebilir; Sabit; Diğer
en: Blade attachment type: Clap; Clip-on; Convertible; Fixed; Other
da: Bladfastgørelsestype: Klap; Clip-on; Konverterbar; Fast; Andet
lt-LT: Geležtės tvirtinimo tipas: „Clap“ sistemos; Užsegamas; Keičiamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип на закрепване на острието: Клеп (Clap); С щипка; Конвертируемо; Фиксирано; Други
zh-TW: 刀片固定類型: 快扣式; 夾式; 可轉換; 固定式; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de fixare al lamei: Clap; Prindere cu clips; Convertibil; Fix; Altele
nb: Festetype for blad: Klapp; Clip-on; Konverterbar; Fast; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve rezila: Clap; Na zaponko; Pretvorljivo; Fiksno; Drugo
nl: Type ijzerbevestiging: Klap; Clip-on; Verstelbaar; Vast; Anders
vi: Kiểu đầu gắn lưỡi dao: Trượt (Clap); Kẹp; Chuyển đổi; Cố định; Khác
hu: Penge rögzítési típusa: Clap; Felcsíptethető; Átalakítható; Fix; Egyéb
ru: Тип крепления лезвия: Клап; На защелке; Сменное; Фиксированное; Другое
zh-CN: 刀片安装类型: 拍击式; 夹式; 可转换; 固定式; 其他
it: Tipo di fissaggio della lama: Clap; A clip; Convertibile; Fissa; Altro
fi: Terän liitostyyppi: Klaps-kiinnitys; Klipsikiinnitys; Muunnettava; Kiinteä; Muu